Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.050

Hearings—Administrative procedure act.

All hearings for the imposition of a civil penalty and/or the suspension, denial, or revocation of a license, certification, or permit issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW concerning adjudicative proceedings.

[ 1994 c 283 s 3. Prior: 1989 c 380 s 36; 1989 c 175 s 58; 1985 c 158 s 4; 1961 c 249 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.